Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Chapter 37. Citizens’ Advisory Commission on Federal Areas in Alaska.

Cross references. —

For termination date of the Citizens’ Advisory Commission on Federal Management Areas in Alaska, see AS

44.66.010

.

Secs. 41.37.010 — 41.37.150.
Citizens’ Advisory Commission on Federal Areas in Alaska. [Repealed, § 3 ch. 81 SLA 1981, as amended by § 1 ch. 25 SLA 1988 and § 1 ch. 71 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 41.37.160.
Citizens’ Advisory Commission on Federal Management Areas in Alaska.

The Citizens’ Advisory Commission on Federal Management Areas in Alaska is established in the department. In the exercise of its responsibilities, the commission shall consider the views of citizens of the state and officials of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.170.
Membership and officers.

The commission is composed of 12 members appointed in accordance with this section.

The membership of the commission shall represent each region of the state to give the commission a reasonable geographic balance among regions of the state.

The governor shall appoint six members of the commission.

The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member of the commission from the membership of the state house of representatives and two members who are residents of the state who are not legislators.

The president of the senate shall appoint one member of the commission from the membership of the state senate and two members who are residents of the state who are not legislators.

Each member of the commission serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority.

The commission shall select a presiding officer of the commission from its membership. The commission may elect other officers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.180.
Qualifications of members.

The members of the commission appointed by the governor under AS

41.37.170(c)

and members appointed under AS

41.37.170(d)

and (e) who are not members of the legislature shall be representative of the diversity of users and uses of federal land in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.190.
Term of members of the commission.

A member of the commission appointed by the governor serves for a term of four years or until a successor is appointed and qualifies.

A member of the commission appointed from the legislature serves for the person’s term of office as a legislator or until a successor is appointed and qualifies.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a member of the commission appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives or president of the senate serves for four years or until a successor is appointed and qualifies.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.200.
Compensation, expenses, and per diem.

A member of the commission who is a legislator or a full-time employee of the state or of a municipality of the state shall suffer no loss of compensation from the state or a municipality of the state as a result of service to the commission.

A member of the commission is entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.210.
Staff of the commission.

The commission may employ staff and contract for services relating to matters within its authority. Staff employed under this section are responsible to the commission.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.220.
Duties of the commission.

The commission shall consider, research, and hold hearings on the consistency with federal law and congressional intent on management, operation, planning, development, and additions to federal management areas in the state.

The commission shall consider, research, and hold hearings on the effect of federal regulations and federal management decisions on the people of the state.

The commission may, after consideration of the public policy concerns under (a) and (b) of this section, make a recommendation on the concerns identified under (a) and (b) of this section to an agency of the state or to the agency of the United States that manages federal land in the state.

The commission shall consider the views, research, and reports of advisory groups established by it under AS

41.37.230

as well as the views, research, and reports of individuals and other groups in the state.

The commission shall establish internal procedures for the management of the responsibilities granted to it under this chapter.

The commission shall report annually to the governor and the legislature within the first 10 days of a regular legislative session.

The commission shall cooperate with each department or agency of the state or with a state board or commission in the fulfillment of its duties.

All hearings of the commission are subject to AS

44.62.310

. Hearings of the commission held under this section shall be noticed as provided in AS

44.62.190

and

44.62.200

, and the hearings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of AS

44.62.210

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.230.
Advisory groups of the commission.

The commission may establish advisory groups in the state.

The commission shall invite nominations for the membership on the advisory groups and shall consider the nominations in making its appointments to the groups.

The membership of each advisory group shall be broadly representative of individuals involved in activities affected by the establishment or management of units of federal land within the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.240.
Suit.

The commission may request the attorney general to file suit against a federal official or agency if the commission determines that the federal official or agency is acting in violation of an Act of Congress, congressional intent, or the best interests of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.250.
Agency cooperation.

Each state department, agency, board, and commission shall cooperate with the commission in the fulfillment of the duties of the commission under AS

41.37.220

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.37.260.
Definition.

In this chapter, “commission” means the Citizens’ Advisory Commission on Federal Management Areas in Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 2007)